nl: Testresultaat uitvoermethode: Analoge meter; Digitaal scherm; Led-indicator (geslaagd/gezakt); Mobiele app; PC-softwarerapport; Printbaar (ingebouwde printer); Overige
fi: Testituloksen näyttö- tai ilmoitustapa: Analoginen mittari; Digitaalinen näyttö; LED-merkkivalo (hyväksytty/hylätty); Mobiilisovellus; PC-ohjelmistoraportti; Tulostettava (sisäänrakennettu tulostin); Muu
sv: Utmatningsmetod för testresultat: Analog mätare; Digital skärm; LED-indikator (godkänd/underkänd); Mobilapp; Rapport via PC-programvara; Utskrift (inbyggd skrivare); Annat
vi: Phương pháp xuất kết quả kiểm tra: Đồng hồ đo cơ học; Màn hình kỹ thuật số; Đèn báo LED (đạt/không đạt); Ứng dụng di động; Báo cáo qua phần mềm PC; Có thể in (máy in tích hợp); Khác
sl-SI: Način prikaza rezultatov testa: Analogni merilnik; Digitalni zaslon; Indikator LED (opravil/ni opravil); Mobilna aplikacija; Poročilo programske opreme za PC; Za tiskanje (vgrajen tiskalnik); Drugo
es: Método de presentación de los resultados de las pruebas: Medidor analógico; Pantalla digital; Indicador led (aprobado/reprobado); App móvil; Informe de software para PC; Imprimible (impresora integrada); Otro
ru: Способ вывода результатов теста: Стрелочный индикатор; Цифровой экран; Светодиодный индикатор (пройден/не пройден); Мобильное приложение; Отчет в программном обеспечении для ПК; Печать (встроенный принтер); Другое
sk-SK: Spôsob zobrazenia výsledkov testu: Analógový merač; Digitálna obrazovka; LED indikátor (úspech/neúspech); Mobilná aplikácia; Report v PC softvéri; Možnosť tlače (vstavaná tlačiareň); Iné
da: Outputmetode for testresultat: Analog måler; Digital skærm; LED-indikator (bestået/ikke bestået); Mobilapp; PC-softwarerapport; Kan udskrives (indbygget printer); Andet
en: Test result output method: Analog gauge; Digital screen; LED indicator (pass/fail); Mobile app; PC software report; Printable (built-in printer); Other
pl: Metoda prezentowania wyników testu: Wskaźnik analogowy; Ekran cyfrowy; Wskaźnik LED (wynik pozytywny/negatywny); Aplikacja mobilna; Raport z oprogramowania na PC; Do wydruku (wbudowana drukarka); Inne
it: Metodo di output dei risultati del test: Indicatore analogico; Schermo digitale; Indicatore LED (superato/non superato); App mobile; Report software per PC; Stampabile (stampante integrata); Altro
ro-RO: Metodă de afișare a rezultatelor testului: Indicator analogic; Ecran digital; Indicator LED (admis/respins); Aplicație pentru mobil; Raport software PC; Imprimabil (imprimantă încorporată); Altele
tr: Test sonucu çıktı yöntemi: Analog gösterge; Dijital ekran; LED gösterge (başarılı/başarısız); Mobil uygulama; Bilgisayar yazılımı raporu; Yazdırılabilir (dahili yazıcı); Diğer
zh-CN: 测试结果输出方法: 模拟仪表; 数字屏幕; LED 指示灯（通过/失败）; 移动应用; PC 软件报告; 可打印（内置打印机）; 其他
th: วิธีการแสดงผลลัพธ์การทดสอบ: เกจอนาล็อก; หน้าจอดิจิทัล; ไฟ LED แสดงสถานะ (ผ่าน/ไม่ผ่าน); แอปมือถือ; รายงานจากซอฟต์แวร์พีซี; พิมพ์ได้ (มีเครื่องพิมพ์ในตัว); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Метод за извеждане на резултатите от теста: Аналогов уред; Цифров екран; LED индикатор (успешно/неуспешно); Мобилно приложение; Отчет чрез софтуер за компютър; За печат (вграден принтер); Друго
lt-LT: Testo rezultatų pateikimo būdas: Analoginis matuoklis; Skaitmeninis ekranas; LED indikatorius (atitinka / neatitinka); Mobilioji programa; Kompiuterinės programos ataskaita; Išspausdinamas (įmontuotas spausdintuvas); Kita
ko: 테스트 결과 출력 방법: 아날로그 게이지; 디지털 화면; LED 표시기(합격/불합격); 모바일 앱; PC 소프트웨어 보고서; 인쇄 가능(내장 프린터); 기타
hu: Teszteredmény-kimeneti módszer: Analóg műszer; Digitális képernyő; LED kijelző (megfelelt/nem felelt meg); Mobilalkalmazás; PC szoftveres jelentés; Nyomtatható (beépített nyomtató); Egyéb
zh-TW: 測試結果輸出方式: 類比量表; 數位螢幕; LED 指示燈 (通過/失敗); 行動應用程式; PC 軟體報告; 可列印 (內建印表機); 其他
pt-PT: Método de apresentação dos resultados de teste: Medidor analógico; Ecrã digital; Indicador LED (passou/falhou); App para dispositivos móveis; Relatório de software de PC; Imprimível (impressora incorporada); Outro
el: Μέθοδος εξόδου αποτελέσματος δοκιμής: Αναλογικός μετρητής; Ψηφιακή οθόνη; Ένδειξη LED (επιτυχία/αποτυχία); Εφαρμογή για κινητά; Αναφορά λογισμικού PC; Εκτυπώσιμο (ενσωματωμένος εκτυπωτής); Άλλο
nb: Metode for utdata av testresultater: Analog måler; Digital skjerm; LED-indikator (bestått/ikke bestått); Mobilapp; PC-programvarerapport; Utskrift (innebygd skriver); Annet
pt-BR: Resultado do teste método de saída: Medidor analógico; Tela digital; Indicador de LED (aprovação/reprovação); App móvel; Relatório de software para PC; Imprimível (impressora integrada); Outros
hr-HR: Metoda ispisa rezultata testa: Analogni mjerač; Digitalni zaslon; LED indikator (prolaz/pad); Mobilna aplikacija; Izvješće softvera za PC; Za ispis (ugrađeni pisač); Ostalo
cs: Způsob prezentace výsledků testu: Analogový měřič; Digitální obrazovka; LED indikátor (úspěch/neúspěch); Mobilní aplikace; Přehled v softwaru na PC; K vytištění (vestavěná tiskárna); Ostatní
fr: Mode de restitution des résultats du test: Jauge analogique; Écran numérique; Voyant LED (succès/échec); Appli mobile; Rapport logiciel PC; Imprimable (imprimante intégrée); Autre
de: Methode zur Ausgabe der Testergebnisse: Analoge Anzeige; Digitaler Bildschirm; LED-Anzeige (Bestanden/Nicht bestanden); Mobile App; PC-Software-Bericht; Druckbar (eingebauter Drucker); Sonstige
ja: テスト結果出力方法: アナログゲージ; デジタルスクリーン; LED インジケーター (合否); モバイルアプリ; PC ソフトウェアレポート; 印刷可能 (プリンター内蔵); その他